Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.050

State honors awards program established—Purpose.

The Washington state honors awards program is hereby established for the purpose of promoting academic achievement among high school students enrolled in public or approved private high schools by recognizing outstanding achievement of students in academic core subjects. This program shall be voluntary on the part of each school district and each student enrolled in high school.

[ 1985 c 62 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.03.440.]

NOTES:

Washington scholars' program: RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150.